02_Morphology/chv.lexc
Multichar_Symbols

%<n%>                ! Noun
%<pl%>               ! Plural
%<nom%>              ! Nominative
%<ins%>              ! Instrumental

%{A%}                ! Placeholder for phonological process cases (archiphoneme [a] or [e])
%{Ă%}                ! Genitive archiphoneme
%{м%}               ! Plural morpheme variation

%<der_лӑх%>        ! Derivative for nouns or adjectives to give abstract meaning


%>                   ! Morpheme boundary

%<gen%>              ! Genitive

%{ъ%}               ! to force back harmony for loan words

LEXICON Root

Guesser ;
Nouns ; 

LEXICON Guesser

🂡%<guess%>:🂡 N ;

LEXICON CASES
%<nom%>:           #;
%<ins%>:%>п%{A%}  #;
%<gen%>:%>%{Ă%}н  #;        ! First option discussed for genitive morpheme

LEXICON PLURAL

                    CASES ;  ! The singular case, input nothing, output nothing, string ends
%<pl%>:%>се%{м%} CASES ;

LEXICON SUBST

PLURAL ;

LEXICON DER-N

%<der_лӑх%>:%>л%{Ă%}х SUBST "weight: 1.0" ; ! derivational suffix to make new nouns or adjectives with abstract meaning

LEXICON N

%<n%>: SUBST ;
%<n%>: DER-N ;

LEXICON N/сть

%<n%>:ҫ SUBST "weight: 0.5" ;
%<n%>%<nom%>:сть # "weight: 1.0" ;

LEXICON Nouns

урам:урам N ;       ! "улица", "street"
пахча:пахча N ;   ! "сад", "garden"
хула:хула N ;       ! "город", "city"
канаш:канаш N ;   ! "совет", "council"
тӗс:тӗс N ;       ! "вид", "aspect"
патша:патша N ;   ! "царь", "tsar"
куҫ:куҫ N ;       ! "глаз", "eye"
патшалӑх:патшалӑх N ;       ! "государство", "state"
специалист:специалист%{ъ%} N ; ! "специалист"
область:обла N/сть; ! last noun of practical
